Hawaii statutes.
[§449-1.5] Applicability of chapter.
This chapter shall apply to all escrow depositories and to any other
corporations that, by violating any of the provisions of this chapter, shall be
subject to the penalties and fines provided in this chapter. [L 1992, c
205, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next